Colorado, session 2026A, HB1403.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-75-302, amend
(3.7)(a); and add (3.7)(c) as follows:
24-75-302. Capital construction fund - capital assessment fees -
calculation - information technology capital account - repeal.
(3.7) (a) There is created a special account within the capital
construction fund established pursuant to subsection (1) of this section to
be known as the information technology capital account. The account
consists of any money appropriated or transferred to the account by the
general assembly. The general assembly may appropriate money in the
account for information technology projects. The appropriation for
information technology projects must be set forth in a single line item as a
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

total sum. For state fiscal years commencing on or before July 1, 2024, all
unappropriated balances in the account at the close of any fiscal year remain
in the account and do not revert to the general fund. EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE
PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (3.7)(c) OF THIS SECTION, for state fiscal years
commencing on or after July 1, 2025, the state treasurer shall transfer any
unappropriated balances in the account or any otherwise unexpended and
unencumbered money remaining in the account at the end of a fiscal year
to the general fund. All unexpended or unencumbered money from an
information technology capital account appropriation to a state agency or
state institution of higher education reverts, for state fiscal years
commencing on or before July 1, 2024, to the account, and, EXCEPT AS
OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (3.7)(c) OF THIS SECTION, for state
fiscal years commencing on or after July 1, 2025, to the general fund at the
end of the period for which the money is appropriated. No portion of the
unexpended balance of a state agency's or state institution of higher
education's information technology capital account appropriation may be
used by the state agency or the state institution of higher education for any
additional projects that are beyond the scope or design of the original
project without further approval by the joint technology committee of the
additional project. Anticipation warrants or checks may be issued against
the revenues of the account as provided by law.
(c) FOR STATE FISCAL YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER JULY 1,
2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL NOT TRANSFER ANY MONEY THAT WAS
TRANSFERRED, CREDITED, OR PAID INTO THE INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
CAPITAL ACCOUNT AS AN INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY ANNUAL
DEPRECIATION-LEASE EQUIVALENT PAYMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION
24-37.5-127 (2) TO THE GENERAL FUND. MONEY TRANSFERRED, CREDITED,
OR PAID INTO THE INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY CAPITAL ACCOUNT AS AN
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY ANNUAL DEPRECIATION-LEASE EQUIVALENT
PAYMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 24-37.5-127 (2), OR ANY OTHER
AMOUNT TRANSFERRED, CREDITED, OR PAID INTO THE INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY CAPITAL ACCOUNT PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-37.5-127 (2),
MUST BE USED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 24-37.5-127.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1403

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1403